Illinois, session 104th, HB1840.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 3-405 and by adding Section 2-106.1 as 6follows: 7    (625 ILCS 5/2-106.1 new)8    Sec. 2-106.1. Alternative registration forms and 9documents.10    (a) As used in this Section, "digital signature" has the 11same meaning as defined in the Financial Institutions 12Electronic Documents and Digital Signature Act.13    (b) The Secretary shall accept forms and documents that 14are manually signed and scanned or signed with a digital 15signature in place of physical hard copies of such forms and 16documents when processing vehicle registration applications. 17    (625 ILCS 5/3-405)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-405)18    Sec. 3-405. Application for registration. 19    (a) Every owner of a vehicle subject to registration under 20this Code shall make application to the Secretary of State for 21the registration of such vehicle upon the appropriate form or 22forms furnished by the Secretary. Except as provided in   HB1840- 2 -LRB104 09364 LNS 19423 b1Section 2-106.1, every Every such original application shall 2bear the signature of the owner written with pen and ink and 3contain:4        1. The name, domicile address, as defined in Section 5    1-115.5 of this Code, (except as otherwise provided in 6    this paragraph 1), mail address of the owner or business 7    address of the owner if a firm, association, or 8    corporation, and, if available, email address of the 9    owner. If the mailing address is a post office box number, 10    the address listed on the driver license record may be 11    used to verify residence. A police officer, a deputy 12    sheriff, an elected sheriff, a law enforcement officer for 13    the Illinois State Police, a fire investigator, a state's 14    attorney, an assistant state's attorney, a state's 15    attorney special investigator, or a judicial officer may 16    elect to furnish the address of the headquarters of the 17    governmental entity, police district, or business address 18    where he or she works instead of his or her domicile 19    address, in which case that address shall be deemed to be 20    his or her domicile address for all purposes under this 21    Chapter 3. The spouse and children of a person who may 22    elect under this paragraph 1 to furnish the address of the 23    headquarters of the government entity, police district, or 24    business address where the person works instead of the 25    person's domicile address may, if they reside with that 26    person, also elect to furnish the address of the   HB1840- 3 -LRB104 09364 LNS 19423 b1    headquarters of the government entity, police district, or 2    business address where the person works as their domicile 3    address, in which case that address shall be deemed to be 4    their domicile address for all purposes under this Chapter 5    3. In this paragraph 1: (A) "police officer" has the 6    meaning ascribed to "policeman" in Section 10-3-1 of the 7    Illinois Municipal Code; (B) "deputy sheriff" means a 8    deputy sheriff appointed under Section 3-6008 of the 9    Counties Code; (C) "elected sheriff" means a sheriff 10    commissioned pursuant to Section 3-6001 of the Counties 11    Code; (D) "fire investigator" means a person classified as 12    a peace officer under the Peace Officer Fire Investigation 13    Act; (E) "state's attorney", "assistant state's attorney", 14    and "state's attorney special investigator" mean a state's 15    attorney, assistant state's attorney, and state's attorney 16    special investigator commissioned or appointed under 17    Division 3-9 of the Counties Code; and (F) "judicial 18    officer" has the meaning ascribed to it in Section 1-10 of 19    the Judicial Privacy Act.20        2. A description of the vehicle, including such 21    information as is required in an application for a 22    certificate of title, determined under such standard 23    rating as may be prescribed by the Secretary.24        3. (Blank). 25        3.5. A space for a voluntary disclosure of a condition 26    that impedes effective communication under Section   HB1840- 4 -LRB104 09364 LNS 19423 b1    3-405.5. 2        4. Such further information as may reasonably be 3    required by the Secretary to enable him to determine 4    whether the vehicle is lawfully entitled to registration 5    and the owner entitled to a certificate of title.6        5. An affirmation by the applicant that all 7    information set forth is true and correct. If the 8    application is for the registration of a motor vehicle, 9    the applicant also shall affirm that the motor vehicle is 10    insured as required by this Code, that such insurance will 11    be maintained throughout the period for which the motor 12    vehicle shall be registered, and that neither the owner, 13    nor any person operating the motor vehicle with the 14    owner's permission, shall operate the motor vehicle unless 15    the required insurance is in effect. If the person signing 16    the affirmation is not the sole owner of the vehicle, such 17    person shall be deemed to have affirmed on behalf of all 18    the owners of the vehicle. If the person signing the 19    affirmation is not an owner of the vehicle, such person 20    shall be deemed to have affirmed on behalf of the owner or 21    owners of the vehicle. The lack of signature on the 22    application shall not in any manner exempt the owner or 23    owners from any provisions, requirements or penalties of 24    this Code. 25    (b) When such application refers to a new vehicle 26purchased from a dealer the application shall be accompanied   HB1840- 5 -LRB104 09364 LNS 19423 b1by a Manufacturer's Statement of Origin from the dealer, and a 2statement showing any lien retained by the dealer.3(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-1069, eff. 7-1-23.)